California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(c) “Roaster” means a young chicken (usually under eight months of age) of either sex, that is tender-meated, with soft, pliable, smooth-textured skin, and breastbone cartilage that is somewhat less flexible than that of a broiler or fryer.

(d) “Caponette,” “caponette fryer,” or “caponette roaster” means a young chicken with the general characteristics of either a fryer or roaster which has been treated with a hormone approved by the Food and Drug Administration of the United States Department of Health, Education and Welfare.

(e) “Capon” means an unsexed male chicken (usually under 10 months of age), that is tender-meated with soft, pliable, smooth-textured skin.

(f) “Hen” or “stewing chicken” or “fowl” means a mature female chicken (usually more than 10 months old) with meat less tender than that of a roaster, and nonflexible breastbone.

(g) “Stag” means a male chicken (usually under 10 months of age) with coarse skin, somewhat toughened and darkened flesh, and considerable hardening of the breastbone cartilage. Stags show a condition of fleshing and a degree of maturity intermediate between that of a roaster and a cock or old rooster.

(h) “Cock” or “old rooster” means a mature male chicken with coarse skin, toughened and darkened meat, and hardened breastbone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 990.)
-------------------------------------------

25853.

The classes of turkey meat as determined by appearance are as follows:

(a) “Fryer” or “roaster” means a young, immature turkey (usually under 16 weeks of age) of either sex, that is tender meated with soft, pliable, smooth-textured skin, and flexible breastbone.

(b) “Young turkey” means a turkey (usually under eight months of age) that is tender meated with soft, pliable, smooth-textured skin, and breastbone cartilage that is somewhat less flexible than in a turkey fryer or roaster. For labeling purposes, the designation of sex within the class name is optional.

(c) “Yearling hen turkey” means a fully matured female turkey (usually under 15 months of age) that is reasonably tender meated and with reasonably smooth-textured skin.

(d) “Yearling tom turkey” means a fully matured male turkey (usually under 15 months of age) that is reasonably tender meated and with reasonably smooth-textured skin.

(e) “Mature turkey” or “old turkey (hen or tom)” means an old turkey of either sex (usually in excess of 15 months of age) with coarse skin and toughened flesh.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25854.

The classes of rabbit meat as determined by appearance and weight are as follows:

(a) “Rabbit fryer” means a young, domestic rabbit (usually under 12 weeks of age) with tender, fine-grained, and bright pearly white color which may be properly cooked by broiling or frying and which weighs not less than 112 pounds or over 312 pounds ready-to-cook weight.

(b) “Rabbit roaster” means a domestic rabbit (over 12 weeks of age) which may be properly cooked by roasting, and which weighs 312 to 5 pounds ready-to-cook weight.

(c) “Stewing rabbit” means a mature domestic rabbit of either sex (over six months of age) which may be properly cooked by stewing at any ready-to-cook weight.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25855.

The following are the various classes of ducks:

(a) “Duckling” means a young duck of either sex (usually under 10 weeks of age) that is tender meated and has a bill that is not completely hardened and windpipe that is easily dented. This classification may include broilers, fryers, or roasters.

(b) “Duck” means a mature duck or an old duck (usually over 10 weeks of age) of either sex with toughened flesh, hardened bill, and a hardened windpipe.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25856.

The following are the various classes of geese:

(a) “Young goose” means a goose of either sex which is tender meated, and has a windpipe that is easily dented.

(b) “Mature goose” or “old goose” means a goose of either sex which has toughened flesh and a hardened windpipe.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25857.

The director may, by regulation, adopt any necessary new class designations and class specifications or modifications of existing class designations and class specifications. He shall, in exercising such authority, take into consideration the standard class designations and class specifications promulgated by the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Requirements [26001. - 26008.]

26001.

A person shall not pack, repack, cut up, recut, or sell poultry meat unless all carcasses and the parts of carcasses are placed in classes established pursuant to this part.

The provisions of this section, except those which require that poultry, poultry meat, or carcasses be placed in classes and marked to show the class of poultry meat, do not apply to New York dressed fowl until November 1, 1967.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26002.

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 26003, 26004, 26005, and 26006, a person shall not pack, repack, cut up, recut, or sell poultry meat unless each carcass or its wrapper or, in the case of cut-up poultry or poultry parts, the container is marked, in the manner which is prescribed by regulations of the director, to show the class of poultry meat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26003.

The provisions of Section 26002, except those which require that poultry, poultry meat, or carcasses be placed in classes and marked to show the class of poultry meat, do not apply to New York dressed fowl until November 1, 1967.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26004.

Individual carcasses of poultry meat or packages of cut-up poultry or poultry parts need not be marked with class designation in any of the following cases:

(a) If they are prepared for use by institutions or public eating houses.

(b) If they are prepared for use for processing.

(c) If they are prepared for transportation or being transported to a plant for further preparation or packaging, and packaged in shipping containers which hold several carcasses or packages of such poultry.

Each shipping container shall be clearly and conspicuously marked with the proper designation of class, and of the intended use, in letters at least one-half of an inch in height, on a surface which is readily visible to the purchaser.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26005.

Poultry parts which are displayed for sale to consumers in bulk without being packaged or wrapped, shall be segregated as to class of poultry meat. The class or classes shall be designated upon a placard which clearly identifies the poultry parts which are designated by the placard in a clear and conspicuous manner that is readily visible to the purchaser.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26006.

Cut-up poultry meat which consists of all of the parts of a carcass, prepared, packaged, and offered for sale shall be from only one class of poultry meat. Containers of poultry parts of different classes, shall be marked to indicate the classes and the quantity of each.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26007.

If a class of any kind of poultry meat contains two or more designations, any combination of the designations may appear in the class marking which is required by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26008.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to sell any whole carcass of chicken poultry meat unless such carcass, or the immediate package or other container in which it is sold, is plainly, legibly, and conspicuously labeled, stamped, tagged, or branded to show the name and address of the poultry plant where the chicken was slaughtered or the name of the state in which the chicken was grown or raised.

(b) Chicken poultry meat which is sold to institutions, to restaurants, or to processors for processing, may bear the label which is required in subdivision (a) of this section on each shipping container in lieu of individual carcass labeling.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Violations [26151. - 26151.]

26151.

It is unlawful for any person to violate any provision of this part or any regulation which is adopted pursuant to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. POULTRY [26401. - 27232.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [26401. - 26441.]



  ARTICLE 1. Application [26401. - 26401.]

26401.

The provisions of this part, including the payment of fees, are applicable to all state and county institutions which are engaging in livestock operations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Investigations [26421. - 26421.]

26421.

The director may make any necessary investigations relative to reported violations of this part pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180), Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Civil Remedies [26441. - 26441.]

26441.

The Attorney General shall, upon complaint by the director, or may upon his own initiative if after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation of any provision of this part has occurred, bring an action in the name of the people of this state in the superior court for an injunction against any person violating any provision of this part or any regulation duly issued by the director pursuant to it.

Any proceedings pursuant to this section shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The director is not, however, required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show or tending to show irreparable damage or loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Sale, Possession, and Transportation [26551. - 26681.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [26551. - 26554.]

26551.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26552.

“Dealer” includes any person that is operating as a poultry retailer, poultry wholesaler, butcher, slaughterer, poultry packer, poultry buyer, or poultry commission merchant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26553.

“Place of business” includes any place or building in which, or at which, the business of a poultry dealer is conducted. Any group of buildings used as an integral part of one business shall be considered as one place of business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26554.

“Poultry” includes chickens, ducks, geese, turkeys, and all other fowls or birds which are used for food or production purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [26581. - 26581.]

26581.

This chapter only applies to the sale, purchase, or marketing of poultry in any county of this state and to the transportation of poultry in, through, or between any county or counties of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Transportation [26601. - 26604.]

26601.

Any person that offers poultry for shipment shall furnish a statement of ownership or right of possession of such poultry to the person, carrier, or transportation company which is to transport such shipment. The statement shall be kept as part of the record of the person, carrier, or transportation company that transports such shipment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26602.

Any person, carrier, or transportation company which receives for transportation or transports any poultry shall at all times keep a correct record which shows all of the following:

(a) The point of origin and destination of any shipment of poultry.

(b) The names and addresses of the shipper and consignee.

(c) The kind and quantity of poultry transported.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26603.

All peace officers, sheriffs or deputy sheriffs, members or officers of the California Highway Patrol and traffic officers may arrest, without warrant, any person that is found moving poultry in any manner which is not prescribed by this chapter, and may seize the poultry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26604.

The carrier from whom the poultry is seized pursuant to Section 26603 is not liable or responsible to the owner, shipper, or consignee for the seizure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Resale [26631. - 26631.]

26631.

Any dealer or person that handles poultry for resale shall make and retain a record which shows all of the following:

(a) The origin, ownership, and right of possession of the poultry.

(b) The name and address of the seller or shipper of the poultry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Brands [26651. - 26652.]

26651.

It is unlawful for any person to brand, or to alter or deface the brand on, any poultry with intent to steal it or to prevent identification of the poultry by the true owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26652.

It is unlawful for any person to have in his possession any poultry the brand on which has been altered or defaced unless he received it from the true owner of the poultry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Fresh Poultry [26661. - 26661.]

26661.

(a) (1) No person who processes, butchers, slaughters, packs, repacks, or sells poultry or poultry meat shall advertise, hold out, distribute, or sell as “fresh” any poultry or poultry meat whose internal temperature has been below 26 degrees Fahrenheit.

(2) No person who processes, butchers, slaughters, packs, repacks, or sells poultry or poultry meat shall label as “fresh” any poultry or poultry meat whose internal temperature has been below 26 degrees Fahrenheit.

(3) No poultry or poultry meat that is distributed or sold as “fresh” shall be stored or handled in such a manner that it reaches an internal temperature below 26 degrees Fahrenheit.

(4) No person who processes, butchers, slaughters, packs, repacks, or sells poultry or poultry meat may sell or distribute poultry or poultry meat if it is adulterated, misbranded, or if its labeling is false or misleading in any particular.

(b) No poultry retailer is guilty of a violation of subdivision (a) or of the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) unless the poultry retailer engages, with actual knowledge, in an act prohibited by subdivision (a).

(c) The secretary may adopt regulations reasonably necessary for carrying out this section, and those regulations shall be, insofar as possible, consistent with regulations adopted by the United States Department of Agriculture.

(d) Each prohibition in subdivision (a) stands alone and if any prohibition in subdivision (a) has been held, or in the future is held, to be unconstitutional, preempted by federal law, or otherwise invalid by any court, all of the other prohibitions set forth in subdivision (a) are intended to, and shall remain, fully effective and shall be interpreted to exclude the unconstitutional, preempted, or otherwise invalid prohibition or prohibitions. If any sentence, clause, word, or portion of this section is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, preempted by federal law, or otherwise invalid, that holding shall not affect the remaining portions of this section. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have enacted this section and each sentence, clause, word, or portion thereof despite the fact that one or more sentences, clauses, words, or portions of this section may be held unconstitutional, preempted by federal law, or otherwise invalid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 106, Sec. 2.   Effective June 16, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Violations [26681. - 26681.]

26681.

Any person that violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon conviction, such person shall be punished by a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200), or by imprisonment not exceeding six months in the county jail, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 115.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Poultry Meat Containing Spoilage Retardant Compound [26801. - 26981.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [26801. - 26803.]

26801.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26802.

“Poultry” means domesticated fowl which is intended for use for human food. It includes chickens, turkeys, ducks, geese, and other domesticated birds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26803.

“Spoilage retardant compound” means any compound, drug, or antibiotic which is added to poultry meat which retards or limits spoilage. Seasonings, spices, or flavorings, such as salt or smoke, are not chemical preservatives.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [26831. - 26832.]

26831.

The director shall adopt regulations for carrying out this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26832.

The director shall enforce this chapter where any poultry meat is packed, repacked, cut up, or recut. The director and the commissioners of each county, under the supervision of the director, shall enforce this chapter where any poultry meat is sold.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Regulations [26861. - 26862.]

26861.

Before being offered for either wholesale or retail sale, any whole carcass of poultry meat to which a spoilage retardant compound has been added shall be marked to indicate the retardant which was used. Such marking shall be affixed to the whole carcass of poultry meat or on the package in which it is offered for sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

26862.

No whole carcass of poultry meat shall be sold unless it is conspicuously and accurately marked in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Violations [26981. - 26981.]

26981.

Any person that violates any provision of this chapter or any regulation which is adopted pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Immersion of Rabbit Carcasses [26991. - 26991.]

26991.

It is unlawful for any person to immerse or soak the carcass of any slaughtered rabbit in water for a period longer than necessary to eliminate the natural animal heat in the carcass and in no event for a period longer than 212 hours.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Moisture Content of Poultry Meat [27001. - 27081.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [27001. - 27003.]

27001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

27002.

“Poultry” means domesticated fowl which is intended for use for human food. It includes chickens, turkeys, ducks, geese, and other domesticated birds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

27003.

“Poultry meat” means the carcass of poultry or any part of the carcass in the raw state. It does not include poultry meat food products.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [27031. - 27034.]

27031.

The director shall enforce this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

27032.

The director may adopt such regulations as are reasonably necessary for carrying out this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

27033.

The regulations which are adopted by the director shall be, insofar as possible, similar to and consistent with regulations which are adopted by the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

27034.

An enforcing officer may do all of the following:

(a) Enter and inspect any place or conveyance where any poultry or poultry meat is produced, prepared, packed, repacked, cut up, recut, stored, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, transported, or sold.

(b) Inspect all poultry and poultry meat and any container of poultry or poultry meat which is found at the place or conveyance which is entered and inspected.

(c) Take for inspection such representative samples of the poultry or poultry meat and the poultry and poultry meat containers as may be necessary to determine by laboratory analysis or other tests whether or not this chapter has been violated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Limitations [27061. - 27061.]

27061.

It is unlawful for any person to sell poultry meat which contains added moisture in excess of 4 percent by weight, or in excess of any greater amount that may be established by regulations of the director as necessary in good commercial processing techniques consistent with protection of the interests of the consuming public.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Violations [27081. - 27081.]

27081.

It is unlawful for any person to violate any provision of this chapter or any regulation which is adopted pursuant to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. California Grown Poultry [27201. - 27232.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [27201. - 27203.]

27201.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

27202.

“Poultry” means domesticated fowl that is intended for use for human food. It includes chickens, game hens, turkeys, ducks, geese, and other domesticated birds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 223, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

27203.

“Poultry meat” means the carcass of poultry or any part of the carcass. It does not include live poultry or manufactured products in which poultry is not the main ingredient.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 27202 by Stats. 1994, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Marks and Labels [27231. - 27232.]

27231.

Before being offered for retail sale in this state, poultry meat of poultry that was grown or raised in this state may be advertised, labeled, described, sold, marked, or otherwise held out, with the words “California grown,” or other similar language indicating that the meat is from California grown or raised poultry.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 223, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

27232.

(a) Poultry meat of poultry that was not grown or raised in this state and packages of that meat shall not be advertised, labeled, described, sold, marked, or otherwise held out as “California grown,” or in any way as to imply that the meat is from California grown or raised poultry.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to violate this section.

(c) A violation of this section constitutes an unfair and unlawful business act or practice under Section 17200 of the Business and Professions Code, and a false or misleading statement under Section 17500 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 223, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. EGGS AND EGG PRODUCTS [27501. - 27690.]



  CHAPTER 1. Eggs [27501. - 27690.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and General Provisions [27501. - 27523.]

27501.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this article shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27502.

“Agent” includes bailee, broker, commission merchant, factor, auctioneer, solicitor, consignee, and any other person that is acting upon the express or implied authority of another.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27503.

“At retail” means a sale or transaction between a retailer and a consumer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27503.5.

“California egg” means an egg produced in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 283, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

27504.

“Candling” means the examination of the interior of eggs by use of a transmitted light.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27505.

“Cold storage eggs” means eggs which have been in cold storage for a period of more than 30 days.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27506.

“Committee” means the Shell Egg Advisory Committee.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27507.

“Consumer” means any person who purchases eggs for his or her own family use or consumption; or any restaurant, hotel, boardinghouse, bakery, or other institution or concern which purchases eggs for serving to guests or patrons thereof, or for its own use in cooking or baking and not for resale in the shell.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27508.

“Container” means any box, case, basket, carton, sack, bag, or any other device which is used to facilitate the handling of eggs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27509.

“Deceptive” means any arrangement of the contents of any container, or subcontainer, or of any lot, load, or display, in which the eggs in the outer layer or in any portion exposed to view are in quality, size, condition, or in any other respect so superior to those in the interior or unexposed portion as to materially misrepresent the contents or any part thereof as to size, quality, condition, or any other respects.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27510.

“Egg handler” means a person engaged in the business of producing, candling, grading, packing, or otherwise preparing shell eggs or pasteurized in-shell eggs for market or who engages in the operation of selling or marketing eggs that he or she has produced, purchased, or acquired from a producer, or which he or she is marketing on behalf of a producer, whether as owner, agent, employee, or otherwise. This section shall not apply to any purchaser who is a retailer and who does not handle eggs in any other capacity, except as a retailer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 11, Sec. 1.   (AB 1414)   Effective April 17, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

27510.1.

“Producer” means a person engaged in the business of producing eggs from domesticated fowl for human consumption, who is not in the business of candling, grading, packing, sorting, or otherwise preparing shell eggs for market, marketing, or processing eggs into egg products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 995, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

27511.

“Egg meats” means the white, yolk, or any part of eggs, in liquid, frozen, dried, or any other form, used, intended or held for use, in the preparation of, or to be a part of or mixed with, food or food products, for human consumption.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27512.

“Egg products” means egg meats.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27513.

“Eggs” means eggs in the shell from chickens, turkeys, ducks, geese, or any other species of fowl.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27514.

“Incubated eggs” means eggs which have been in the course of incubation, whether natural or artificial.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27515.

“Incubator rejects” means incubated eggs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27516.

“Marked” means plainly, legibly, and conspicuously labeled, stamped, stenciled, printed, or branded.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27517.

“Mislabel” means the presence of any false, deceptive, or misleading mark, term, statement, design, device, inscription, or any other designation upon any eggs or upon any container or subcontainer of eggs, or upon the label, lining, or wrapper thereof, or upon any placard or sign used in connection therewith, or in connection with any bulk lot or display having reference to eggs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27518.

“Retailer” means any person who sells eggs to a consumer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27519.

“Shell eggs” means any in-shell eggs other than pasteurized in-shell eggs, as defined in Section 27519.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 11, Sec. 2.   (AB 1414)   Effective April 17, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

27519.5.

“Shipped egg” means an egg that is produced outside the State of California and shipped into the state for purposes of resale or use by a direct user.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 283, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

27519.6.

“Pasteurized in-shell eggs” means in-shell eggs that have been pasteurized by any method approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration or the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 11, Sec. 3.   (AB 1414)   Effective April 17, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

27520.

“Subcontainer” means any container when being used within another container.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27521.

The purposes of this chapter are as follows:

(a) To assure that healthful and wholesome eggs of known quality are sold in this state.

(b) To facilitate the orderly marketing of shell eggs in a uniform manner.

(c) To prevent the marketing of deceptive or mislabeled containers of eggs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------

27522.

“Eggs that are packaged for export” means those eggs destined for conveyance to any location outside the United States or its territories.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

27523.

“Eggs that are packaged for interstate commerce” means those eggs destined for sale outside the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 197, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Regulations [27531. - 27534.]

27531.

The director may adopt regulations relating to the preparation for market and marketing of shell eggs as he or she determines are reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The regulations may include any of the following:

(a) The establishment of grade standards including minimum quality and minimum size.

(b) Pack specifications.

(c) Marking requirements.

(d) Sampling procedures for enforcement purposes.

(e) Control and disposition of substandard lots.

(f) Use of registered brands and containers, including transportation.

(g) Requirements for displays and advertising.

(h) Procedures for the registration of shell egg handlers.

(i) Procedures for the collection of registration fees and assessments.

(j) Procedures for the development and collection of data pertaining to egg production, number of chickens, and other information as recommended by the committee.

(k) Any other matter necessary for the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 507, Sec. 1.   Effective August 13, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

27532.

The regulations relating to grade standards which are adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 27531 shall be consistent with the grade standards promulgated by the United States Department of Agriculture contained in Title 7, Code of Federal Regulations, Section 2856.216.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1130, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

27533.

Regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter relating to egg shell surveillance inspection shall be consistent with any federal standards or procedures promulgated by the United States Department of Agriculture on that subject.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1130, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

27534.

The director shall adopt regulations by which eggs which do not meet the size or appearance standards generally required for marketing but which are healthy for consumption may be sold directly to consumers for their own family use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1130, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Registration of Egg Handlers [27541. - 27542.]

27541.

Any person engaged in business in this state as an egg producer or egg handler, or any out-of-state egg handler or egg producer selling eggs into California, shall register with the secretary. A new registration shall be submitted if any current information changes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 283, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

27542.

The certificate of registration shall not be transferable to any person, or be applicable to any location other than the location for which originally issued, and shall be conspicuously displayed at such location.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Assessment Fees [27551. - 27555.]

27551.

The following persons shall pay to the secretary a maximum fee of fifteen cents ($0.15) for each 30 dozen eggs sold as provided below:

(a) California egg handlers shall pay the fee on all egg sales from their own production, on eggs purchased or acquired from California egg producers, and on eggs processed into egg products. California egg handlers shall not pay a fee on eggs purchased from out-of-state egg handlers or egg producers.

(b) California egg producers shall pay the fee on all egg sales to anyone not registered under this chapter as an egg handler, to out-of-state purchasers, and to egg breaking plants.

(c) Out-of-state egg handlers and producers
 shall report and pay the fee on egg sales into California sold to a retailer, producer, handler, or breaking plant, and on egg products brought into the state, at a maximum rate of fifteen cents ($0.15) for each equivalent of 30 dozen eggs.

(d) Shipments of eggs that are accompanied by a United States Department of Agriculture certificate of grade and sold to the federal government or its agencies are exempt from these fees.

(e) Eggs sold to household consumers on the premises where produced from a total flock size of 500 hens or fewer are exempt from these fees.

(f) The assessment provided for in this section shall be paid only once on any particular egg.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 51.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

27552.

The fees provided in Section 27551 are maximum fees and shall be established at a lower rate by the secretary at any time the funds derived from the assessment are more than reasonably necessary to cover the cost of
 administration and enforcement of this chapter, including the maintenance of a reasonable reserve fund for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (SB 549)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27553.

The secretary may, by regulation, prescribe the frequency of payment of assessments, the procedures for payment, the procedures for refunds of payment, and penalties for late payment. However, the department may triple the assessment for any eggs for which the required payment has not been made by the established due date. If a triple assessment is less than five hundred dollars ($500), the assessment shall be five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 283, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

27554.

The moneys which are received by the director pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and shall be used only for the administration and enforcement of this chapter, including, but not limited to, payments to commissioners pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 27561). The moneys are exempt from the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 13320) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1130, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

27555.

The director may assess a special fee upon egg handlers who use descriptive terms on egg containers that require laboratory analysis to verify the terms. This fee shall be used for laboratory analysis necessary for label approval and continued surveillance for compliance with the descriptive terms.